Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1910.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 811. School Supplies for Educators Grant Program.--(a) The School Supplies for Educators Grant Program is established in the department for the purpose of providing funds to teachers and specialized instructional support personnel for the online purchase of school supplies.(b) The department shall:12345678910111213141516171819 (1) Identify one or more authorized software services providers to offer and support a user-friendly online e-commerce platform that:(i) Processes the allocation of funds by the department to the user accounts of eligible teachers and specialized instructional support personnel for the online purchase of school supplies and necessary materials for school operations from authorized e-commerce vendors.(ii) Includes appropriate fiscal management and payment systems and reporting and training tools, as required by the department.(2) Ensure that purchases using program funds are restricted to online purchases of school supplies and necessary materials for school operations from authorized e-commerce vendors.(3) Ensure that no more than five hundred dollars ($500) is allocated to an individual user account of a teacher or specialized instructional support personnel per school year.(4) Promulgate regulations, including guidelines, and provide technical assistance to facilitate local school systems, public schools and educators that utilize the program.(5) Establish processes as necessary for the implementation of the program consistent with the provisions of this section.(c) A school entity shall certify the eligibility of each teacher or specialized instructional support personnel employed by the school entity who requests a user account. A teacher or specialized instructional support personnel who is employed in good standing by a school entity shall be eligible for the grant program.(d) The department may use the following to award grants under the program.20250HB1910PN2391 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Appropriations made by the General Assembly for the program.(2) Funding from other sources received by the department for the program.(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Authorized e-commerce vendor." An e-commerce vendor that has been approved by the department."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."E-commerce." A commercial transaction, which may include the transmission of funds or data, or both, conducted electronically via the Internet."Program." The School Supplies for Educators Grant Program established under this section."School entity." A school district, charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school."Specialized instructional support personnel." Any of the following individuals who are employed by a school entity:(1) A school counselor.(2) A school nurse.(3) A school psychologist.(4) A school social worker."Teacher." A classroom teacher who is employed by a school entity.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1910PN2391 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627